District of Columbia statutes.
47-1202.01

Deferral or forgiveness of special assessments.

The Mayor may defer or forgive, in whole or in part, any special assessment levied by the District of Columbia with respect to any qualified real property approved pursuant to § 6-1503.

History

June 25, 1938, ch. 702, § 2a
as added Oct. 20, 1988, D.C. Law 7-177, § 7, 35 DCR 6158
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1202.1.
1973 Ed., § 47-1102.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 13 of D.C. Law 7-177 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.